Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB282.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 189.920 is amended to read as follows:
(1) All fire department, rescue squad, or publicly owned emergency management
agency emergency vehicles and all ambulances shall be equipped with one (1) or
more flashing, rotating, or oscillating red lights, visible under normal atmospheric
conditions from a distance of five hundred (500) feet to the front of the vehicle, and
a siren, whistle, or bell, capable of emitting a sound audible under normal
conditions from a distance of not less than five hundred (500) feet. This equipment
shall be in addition to any other equipment required by the motor vehicle laws.
(2) All state, county, or municipal police vehicles and all sheriffs' vehicles used as
emergency vehicles shall be equipped with one (1) or more flashing, rotating, or
oscillating blue lights, visible under normal atmospheric conditions from a distance
of five hundred (500) feet to the front of the vehicle, and a siren, whistle, or bell,
capable of emitting a sound audible under normal conditions from a distance of not
less than five hundred (500) feet. This equipment shall be in addition to any other
equipment required by the motor vehicle laws.
(3) By ordinance, the governing body of any city or county may direct that the police or
sheriffs' vehicles in that jurisdiction be equipped with a combination of red and blue
flashing, rotating, or oscillating lights.
(4) (a) All public safety vehicles shall be equipped with one (1) or more flashing,
rotating, or oscillating yellow lights, visible under normal atmospheric
conditions from a distance of five hundred (500) feet to the front of the
vehicle. Yellow flashing, rotating, or oscillating lights may also be used by
vehicles operated by mail carriers while on duty, funeral escort vehicles, and
church buses.
(b) In addition to the lights required in paragraph (a) of this subsection, a
Page 1 of 4
XXXX 1/8/2026 1:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 33
wrecker may be equipped with one (1) or more flashing, rotating, or
oscillating blue lights, visible under normal atmospheric conditions from a
distance of five hundred (500) feet to the rear of the vehicle. The operator of
a wrecker may use the blue lights allowed under this paragraph only when
the wrecker is stationary and while removing a vehicle or debris from a
highway. The operator of a wrecker shall not use blue lights when towing a
vehicle on a highway.
(5) All Department of Corrections vehicles used as emergency vehicles shall be
equipped with one (1) or more flashing, rotating, or oscillating blue lights, visible
under normal atmospheric conditions from a distance of five hundred (500) feet to
the front of the vehicle. The Department of Corrections vehicles shall not be
equipped with or use a siren, whistle, or bell. The equipment prescribed by this
subsection shall be in addition to any other equipment required by motor vehicle
laws.
(6) (a) If authorized by the legislative body of a county, urban-county government,
charter county government, consolidated local government, or unified local
government:
1. All publicly owned county jail and regional jail vehicles used as
emergency vehicles may be equipped with the one (1) or more flashing,
rotating, or oscillating blue lights, visible under normal atmospheric
conditions from a distance of five hundred (500) feet to the front of the
vehicle; and
2. An elected jailer or the chief administrator of a county or regional jail
not managed by an elected jailer may equip one (1) personally owned
vehicle with one (1) or more flashing, rotating, or oscillating blue lights,
visible under normal atmospheric conditions from a distance of five
hundred (500) feet to the front of the vehicle.
Page 2 of 4
XXXX 1/8/2026 1:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 33
(b) Publicly owned county jail or regional jail vehicles shall not be equipped with
or use a siren, whistle, or bell.
(c) The equipment prescribed by this subsection shall be in addition to any other
equipment required by the motor vehicle laws.
(7) Red flashing lights may be used by school buses.
(8) No emergency vehicle, public safety vehicle, or any other vehicle covered by KRS
189.910 to 189.950 shall use any light of any other color than those specified by
KRS 189.910 to 189.950. Sirens, whistles, and bells may not be used by vehicles
other than those specified by KRS 189.910 to 189.950, except that any vehicle may
be equipped with a theft alarm signal device which is so arranged that it cannot be
used by the driver as an ordinary warning signal.
(9) Vehicles used as command posts at incidents may be equipped with and use when
on scene, a green rotating, oscillating, or flashing light. This light shall be in
addition to the lights and sirens required in this section.
(10) A personal vehicle used by a paid or volunteer firefighter, ambulance personnel, or
emergency services director who is responding to an emergency shall display the
lights required in subsection (1) of this section.
(11) An elected coroner may equip a publicly or privately owned motor vehicle, or both,
with flashing, rotating, or oscillating red and blue lights and a siren meeting the
requirements of this section solely for the purpose of responding to a report of the
death of a human being subject to the following terms and conditions:
(a) The coroner makes a written request to the legislative body of the county,
urban-county government, charter county government, consolidated local
government, or unified local government in which the coroner was elected to
equip a publicly or privately owned motor vehicle, or both, with flashing,
rotating, or oscillating red and blue lights and a siren meeting the
requirements of this section, and that request is approved by the legislative
Page 3 of 4
XXXX 1/8/2026 1:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 33
body by ordinance or by court order;
(b) The coroner may use the lights and siren only while responding to the scene
of the report of a death of a human being and shall not, KRS 189.940 to the
contrary notwithstanding, exceed the posted speed limit; and
(c) The permission granted pursuant to this section shall expire upon the coroner
leaving office or the legislative body revoking the authorization.
(12) A deputy coroner certified pursuant to KRS Chapter 72 may equip a publicly
owned or privately owned motor vehicle, or both, with flashing, rotating, or
oscillating red and blue lights and a siren meeting the requirements of this section
solely for the purpose of responding to a report of the death of a human being,
subject to the following terms and conditions:
(a) The deputy coroner has made a written request to the coroner to equip a
publicly owned or privately owned vehicle with flashing, rotating, or
oscillating red and blue lights meeting the requirements of this section and the
coroner has approved the request in writing;
(b) The coroner makes a written request to the legislative body of the county,
urban-county government, charter county government, consolidated local
government, or unified local government in which the coroner is elected to
permit the deputy coroner to equip a publicly owned motor vehicle or
privately owned motor vehicle, or both, and that request has been approved by
the legislative body by ordinance or by court order;
(c) The deputy coroner may use the lights and siren only while responding to the
scene of the report of the death of a human being and shall not, KRS 189.940
to the contrary notwithstanding, exceed the posted speed limit; and
(d) The permission granted pursuant to this section shall expire upon the coroner
leaving office or the legislative body revoking the authorization.
Section 2. This Act may be cited as Troy's Law.
Page 4 of 4
XXXX 1/8/2026 1:54 PM Jacketed